Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1702.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1289.24f of Title 21, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Firearm


Preservation Act”.


B. As used in this section:


1. “Federal firearms license” means a license issued by the


United States Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives


that authorizes an individual or entity to engage in certain


activities related to firearms;



Req. No. 3171 Page 1


2. “Firearm” means any weapon that will or is designed to expel


a projectile by the action of an explosive; and


3. “Law enforcement agency” means any state, county, municipal,


or other law enforcement entity in this state.


C. 1. A firearm obtained through a court-ordered turnover,


estate settlement due to death, forfeiture, or any other method of


acquisition by this state or any political subdivision thereof shall


not be destroyed or rendered permanently inoperable.


2. Any such firearm obtained by this state or any political


subdivision thereof shall be retained by the acquiring entity until


the firearm is lawfully disposed of pursuant to the provisions of


this section.


D. 1. A law enforcement agency shall auction firearms obtained


pursuant to the provisions of this section exclusively to


individuals who are lawfully eligible to purchase such firearms


under state and federal law.


2. An individual who purchases a handgun shall be subject to,


and pass, any required criminal history record check required by


state and federal law.


3. Any proceeds from an auction of firearms shall be allocated


to the law enforcement agency that conducted the auction for


operational expenses, training, or other purposes consistent with


state law.



Req. No. 3171 Page 2


4. A firearm shall be transferred in compliance with any


applicable state and federal regulations.


E. No law enforcement agency nor personnel thereof shall be


held liable in a civil or criminal proceeding for any harm, injury,


or death caused by the subsequent use of a firearm that was


auctioned to an eligible buyer pursuant to the provisions of this


section.


F. 1. Any law enforcement agency that conducts an auction


pursuant to the provisions of this section shall maintain records of


all auctioned firearms, including the firearm purchaser’s federal


firearms license number and a record of payment.


2. Such records shall be retained for a period no less than


five (5) years and shall be subject to inspection by the Attorney


General.


G. 1. Any law enforcement agency in violation of the


provisions of this section shall be subject to a fine of Five


Hundred Dollars ($500.00) for the first offense and a fine of One


Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each subsequent offense.


2. Any fine collected pursuant to the provisions of this


section shall be deposited into the General Revenue Fund.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3171 CN 1/14/2026 10:29:52 AM



Req. No. 3171 Page 3